Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Penalties

227.990.
Penalties.

Except for manufactured homes manufactured under the federal act, any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any provision of a lawful order, rule, or regulation made under the provisions of this chapter, or who induces another to violate any provisions of this chapter or of any lawful order, rule, or regulation made thereunder, upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or confined in the county jail for not more than sixty (60) days, or both. Each day such violations exist shall, in the discretion of the courts, be considered as a separate offense.

Any person who, for manufactured homes manufactured under the federal act, violates any provision of the federal act or of KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or any regulation or final order issued thereunder shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each such violation. Each violation of a provision of KRS

227.550

to

227.660

or of the federal act or any regulation or order issued thereunder shall constitute a separate violation with respect to each manufactured home or mobile home or with respect to each failure or refusal to allow or perform an act required thereby, except that the maximum civil penalty may not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for any related series of violations occurring within one (1) year from the date of the first violation.

Any individual, or a director, officer, or agent of a corporation who knowingly and willfully violates the federal act or KRS

227.550

to

227.660

in a manner which threatens the health or safety of any purchaser shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one (1) year in the county jail, or both.

Any person violating the provisions of KRS

227.702

to

227.750

, the regulations issued thereunder, or any order issued thereunder, or who knowingly induces another, directly or indirectly, to violate the provisions of those sections, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 22; 1978, ch. 305, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 19, § 4, effective May 12, 1979; 1980, ch. 49, § 19, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 200, § 10, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 436, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 340, § 13, effective July 15, 1996.

227.991.
Penalties.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates subsections (2), (3), (4) or (5) of KRS

227.410

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) and not more than fifty dollars ($50).

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 96, § 5.

227.992.
Penalty.

Any person who willfully manufactures a manufactured home, sells, or offers for sale a manufactured home, mobile home, or recreational vehicle in this state in violation of KRS

227.550

to

227.660

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by confinement in the county jail for a period of not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 76, § 13; 1996, ch. 340, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 169, § 86, effective June 29, 2017.